src/fst/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
!! Acronyms

LEXICON Acronyms
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! TÜ, TTÜ, A, AI
  < [[CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow^>1] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! ACAI, AEGEE, 
  < [[CapCons* CapConsv] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! T, TT, NKVD, 
  < [[CapVow   CapConsv] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! AQ, AB, 
!  < [CapVow^>1 [C|Q]] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! AAQ, AAC, ? 
  < [[CapVow^>1 CapConsv] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! AAK (+ AcroFiat)
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapNonPairC] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! ABC, 
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! ARK, ASK, (+ AcroFiat) 
  < [[CapVow+ CapCons^>1 CapConsv] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroArmee ;  ! AADRC, AADRV?

  < [[CapCons* CapConsc] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! L, XL
  < [[CapVow   CapConsc] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! AL, IJ
  < [[CapVow^>1 [CapCons - [C|Q]]] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! AAK, (+ AcroArmee)
  < [[CapCons+ CapVow+ CapCons] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! MAL, QIJ, MAC
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! TASS, AND, IRC?
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapConsc] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroFiat ;  ! AADRL
  IŽ AcroFiat ;  ! parallel 
  ACE AcroFiat ; ! parallel
  ASEAN AcroFiat ; !

  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons+ | Y] CapVow] & CapLetter^<6 & ~[{CHINA}] ] "+ACR":0 > AcroPere ;  ! NATO, EKI, EKRE, IATE

  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons+ | Y] CapVow [CapCons - S]] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroRedel ;  ! UNIX, BAYER
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow CapConsv S] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroRedel ;  ! UNIKS
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons - [L|R]] [L|R]] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroRedel ;  ! TISL
  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC [L|R]] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroRedel ;  ! TIMBL

  < [[CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow S] & CapLetter^<6 ] "+ACR":0 > AcroEtis ;  ! ETIS


! An acronym that may be first part of a compound:
! a sequence of capital letters; max length 5 and a trailing hyphen
LEXICON Acrominus

  < CapLetter^{1,5} "+ACR":"-" > # ;
